Illinois, session 104th, SB1521.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Electric Vehicle Rebate Act is amended by 5adding Section 50 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 120/50 new)7    Sec. 50. Electric bicycle rebate.8    (a) In this Section, "electric bicycle" means a low-speed 9electric bicycle, as defined in Section 11-1517 of the 10Illinois Vehicle Code, that has an electrical system that has 11been tested by an accredited testing laboratory for compliance 12with Underwriters Laboratories Standard UL 2849 and European 13Standard EN 15194. "Electric bicycle" does not include an 14electric moped. 15    (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, and continuing as long as 16funds are available, a person may apply for a rebate following 17the purchase of an electric bicycle in Illinois. 18Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), a rebate awarded under 19this Section shall not exceed the purchase price of the 20electric bicycle. A rebate awarded under this Section shall be 21in the amount of:22        (1) $400 for a person who is not a low-income 23    purchaser of the electric bicycle; and  SB1521- 2 -LRB104 11471 BDA 21560 b1        (2) $1,200 for a person who is a low-income purchaser 2    of the electric bicycle.3    (c) To be eligible to receive a rebate under this Section, 4a person must:5        (1) reside in Illinois at the time the person 6    purchases the electric bicycle and at the time the rebate 7    is issued;8        (2) have purchased the electric bicycle in Illinois on 9    or after July 1, 2024;10        (3) own the electric bicycle at the time the rebate is 11    issued;12        (4) not have purchased the electric bicycle from an 13    out-of-state seller;14        (5) apply for the rebate within 90 days after the date 15    that the electric bicycle was leased or purchased if the 16    electric vehicle was leased or purchased on or after July 17    1, 2026; and18        (6) provide the Agency with proof that the person 19    resides in Illinois and owns the electric bicycle and that 20    the electric bicycle was purchased in Illinois, including, 21    but not limited to, a copy of a purchase agreement noting 22    an Illinois seller.23    (d) A person who is awarded a rebate under this Section 24must notify the Agency of any change in the person's residency 25or ownership of the electric bicycle occurring between 26applying for a rebate and its issuance.  SB1521- 3 -LRB104 11471 BDA 21560 b1    (e) The Agency shall:2        (1) provide materials for submitting an application 3    under this Section;4        (2) adopt rules defining "low-income purchaser" for 5    purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) and this 6    subsection; and7        (3) prioritize reviewing applications of low-income 8    purchasers and shall give preference to low-income 9    applicants in awarding rebates under this Section.10    (f) A person who is awarded a rebate under this Section 11must retain ownership of the electric bicycle for a minimum of 1212 consecutive months immediately after its purchase. During 13that time, the person must continuously reside in Illinois and 14register the electric bicycle in Illinois. A person who 15receives a rebate under this Section and fails to satisfy any 16of the requirements of this subsection shall reimburse the 17Agency all or part of the rebate amount awarded to the person 18and shall notify the Agency of the failure within 60 days after 19it occurs.20    (g) Rebates may be awarded under this Section for the 21purchase of a new or used electric bicycle.22    (h) A person may apply for and receive a rebate under this 23Section only once in a 10-year period, and only one rebate may 24be awarded per person per electric bicycle.